Florida, session 2026, SB1702.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âPresent subsections (16) and (17) of section 12 381.986, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (17) 13 and (18), respectively, and a new subsection (16) is added to 14 that section, to read: 15 381.986âMedical use of marijuana.â 16 (16)âIMMUNITY FROM CIVIL LIABILITY.âAn employer that takes 17 action against a current or prospective employee based on the 18 employeeâs possession or use of marijuana is immune from civil 19 liability if: 20 (a)1.âThe possession or use of marijuana occurs on a 21 workplace site; or 22 2.âThe current or prospective employee tests positive for 23 marijuana upon submitting to a drug test administered in 24 accordance with the requirements of s. 112.0455; and 25 (b)âThe use of marijuana impairs the employeeâs ability to 26 perform his or her employment duties or responsibilities. 27 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.